District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.13

Voting by investor members.

If the organic rules provide for investor members, each investor member shall have one vote, unless the organic rules otherwise provide. The organic rules may provide for the allocation of investor member voting power by class, classes, or any combination of classes.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 513 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.